nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.aff
FLAG num
SFX 46 Y 6
SFX 46 0 इ/43 [ा]
SFX 46 ु ोइ/43 [ु]
SFX 46 ा ुवाउ/42 [ा]
SFX 46 0 वाउ/42 [ु]
SFX 46 ा ुवाइ/43 [ा]
SFX 46 0 वाइ/43 [ु]


SFX 47 Y 158
SFX 47 0 ँदारहेछौ .
SFX 47 0 नेथियो .
SFX 47 0 नुपरिरहेको .
SFX 47 0 नेगर्दछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुन्न .
SFX 47 0 नेछन् .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्ला .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्दछ .
SFX 47 0 नुछ .
SFX 47 0 नलाग्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुभएनछ .
SFX 47 0 नुभयो .
SFX 47 0 नुभएर .
SFX 47 0 नुभएको .
SFX 47 0 नुभएन .
SFX 47 0 नुभएका .
SFX 47 0 नुभएछ .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्दा .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्दो .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्नेछ .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्थ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्दैन .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुपरेर .
SFX 47 0 नुपरे .
SFX 47 0 नुपरेको .
SFX 47 0 नुपरेन .
SFX 47 0 नुपरेका .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्नेबारे .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्ने .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्छ .
SFX 47 0 नुपरेछ .
SFX 47 0 नुपरे .
SFX 47 0 नुपर्नेछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुने .
SFX 47 0 नुहुन .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदै .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदा .
SFX 47 0 नुहुन्थ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदैछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुहोस् .
SFX 47 0 नुहोला .
SFX 47 0 नुहुनेबारे .
SFX 47 0 नुहुन्छ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुनेछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुने .
SFX 47 0 नुहुन .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदै .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदा .
SFX 47 0 नुहुन्छ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुनेछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुन्थ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदैन .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदैछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुहोस् .
SFX 47 0 नुहोला .
SFX 47 0 नुहुनेबारे .
SFX 47 0 ँदोरहेछु .
SFX 47 0 ँदोरहेछौ .
SFX 47 0 ँदारहेछौँ .
SFX 47 0 ँदोरहेछस् .
SFX 47 0 ँदोरहेछ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्यो .
SFX 47 0 नसके .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छ .
SFX 47 0 नसकेछ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछन् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नु .
SFX 47 0 नसक्ने .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दि .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दो .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छु .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छौ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छस् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छौँ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छेस् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छन् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छिन् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछौँ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछौ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छ्यौ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्छे .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछस् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्थिस् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्थ्यौ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछन् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्थ्यौँ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्थे .
SFX 47 0 नसक्थ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नसक्थि .
SFX 47 0 नसक्थिन् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दैन .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दैनौ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दैनौँ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दिनौ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दैनन् .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछु .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेछौँ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दैनथे .
SFX 47 0 नसक्यौँ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्यौ .
SFX 47 0 नसकेनन् .
SFX 47 0 नसकेर .
SFX 47 0 नसकेन .
SFX 47 0 नसकेनौ .
SFX 47 0 नसकेनौँ .
SFX 47 0 नसकेस् .
SFX 47 0 नसकोस् .
SFX 47 0 नसकेछ .
SFX 47 0 नसकेछन् .
SFX 47 0 नसकेछौ .
SFX 47 0 नसकुन्जेल .
SFX 47 0 नसकिन् .
SFX 47 0 नसकिन .
SFX 47 0 नसकिनस् .
SFX 47 0 नसकिँन .
SFX 47 0 नसकिनौ .
SFX 47 0 नसकिनन् .
SFX 47 0 नसकिस् .
SFX 47 0 नसकि .
SFX 47 0 नसकिनेछ .
SFX 47 0 नसकिएला .
SFX 47 0 नसकुन् .
SFX 47 0 नसकिछस् .
SFX 47 0 नसकिछन् .
SFX 47 0 नसकिछ .
SFX 47 0 नसकुँ .
SFX 47 0 नसकेको .
SFX 47 0 नसकेका .
SFX 47 0 नसक्ला .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नेबारे .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नुभयो .
SFX 47 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नसकिएछ .
SFX 47 0 नसक्दछ . 
SFX 47 0 दारहेछौ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदै .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदा .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदैछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदै .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदा .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदैन .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदैछ .
SFX 47 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो .
SFX 47 0 दोरहेछु .
SFX 47 0 दोरहेछौ .
SFX 47 0 दारहेछौ .
SFX 47 0 दोरहेछस् .
SFX 47 0 दोरहेछ .
SFX 47 0 नसकु .


SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 ै .

SFX 49 Y 10
SFX 49 0 ०/50 .
SFX 49 0 १/50 .
SFX 49 0 २/50 .
SFX 49 0 ३/50 .
SFX 49 0 ४/50 .
SFX 49 0 ५/50 .
SFX 49 0 ६/50 .
SFX 49 0 ७/50 .
SFX 49 0 ८/50 .
SFX 49 0 ९/50 .

SFX 50 Y 10
SFX 50 0 ० .
SFX 50 0 १ .
SFX 50 0 २ .
SFX 50 0 ३ .
SFX 50 0 ४ .
SFX 50 0 ५ .
SFX 50 0 ६ .
SFX 50 0 ७ .
SFX 50 0 ८ .
SFX 50 0 ९ .
