nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.dic
०/49
१/49
२/49
३/49
४/49
५/49
६/49
७/49
८/49
९/49
१०/49
११/49
१२/49
१३/49
१४/49
१५/49
१६/49
१७/49
१८/49
१९/49
२०/49
२१/49
२२/49
२३/49
२४/49
२५/49
२६/49
२७/49
२८/49
२९/49
३०/49
३१/49
३२/49
३३/49
३४/49
३५/49
३६/49
३७/49
३८/49
३९/49
४०/49
४१/49
४२/49
४३/49
४४/49
४५/49
४६/49
४७/49
४८/49
४९/49
५०/49
५१/49
५२/49
५३/49
५४/49
५५/49
५६/49
५७/49
५८/49
५९/49
६०/49
६१/49
६२/49
६३/49
६४/49
६५/49
६६/49
६७/49
६८/49
६९/49
७०/49
७१/49
७२/49
७३/49
७४/49
७५/49
७६/49
७७/49
७८/49
७९/49
८०/49
८१/49
८२/49
८३/49
८४/49
८५/49
८६/49
८७/49
८८/49
८९/49
९०/49
९१/49
९२/49
९३/49
९४/49
९५/49
९६/49
९७/49
९८/49
९९/49
खा/8,46,47
धु/8,46,47
रु/8,46,47
हु/8,47
